test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-soddad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - luuhâđ: # not checked

    Verb-viggâđ: not checked
    
    viggâđ+V+Inf: viggâđ
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: vigguđ
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigguum
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vigguuh
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viggoo
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viggojeen
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vigguuvettee
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vigguv
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viggup
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vigguuvetteđ
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viggojeh
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viggojim
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viggojih
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viggui
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vigguim
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vigguid
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vigguin
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vigguim
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vigguid
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viggojii
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vigguuččim
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vigguuččih
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vigguuččij
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vigguuččáim
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vigguuččáid
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vigguuččáin
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vigguuččijm
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vigguuččijd
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vigguuččii
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vigguužeem
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vigguužeeh
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vigguš
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vigguužeen
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: viggušvettee
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vigguužává
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vigguužep
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viggušvetteđ
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vigguužeh
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vigguu
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viggum
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: viguáččii
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vigguužii
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: vigguee
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: viggum
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: viggum
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: viggum
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: viggum
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: vigguumin
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: vigguumist
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: vigguumân
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: viggutijn
    viggâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: vigguuhánnáá
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâdâm
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vigâdah
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vigâd
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vigâdeen
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vigâdvettee
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vigâdává
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vigâdeh
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vigâd
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vigâdim
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vigâdij
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vigâdii
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vigâdiččim
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vigâdičij
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vigâdižžeem
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vigâdiš
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vigâd
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vigâdâm
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vigâdižžii
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: vigâdâm
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: vigâdhánnáá
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: vigâdem
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: vigâdmân
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: vigâdmin
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: vigâdmist
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: vigâddijn
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: vigâddijnân
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: vigâddijnâd
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: vigâddijnis
    viggâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: viggxxxx
    viggâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâstâm
    viggâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâttâm
    viggâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâškuáđám
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâlâm
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viiggâl
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vigâleen
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vigâleh
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viiggâl
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vigâlim
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vigâlij
    viggâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vigâlii
